Rhode Island, session 2025, SB146.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-47-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-47 entitled "Weapons" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
11-47-9. Persons exempt from restrictions.
(a) The provisions of § 11-47-8 shall not apply to sheriffs; deputy sheriffs; the
superintendent and members of the state police; members of the Rhode Island airport police
department; members of the Rhode Island state marshals; Rhode Island state fire marshal; chief
deputy state fire marshals; deputy state fire marshals assigned to the bomb squad, and those
assigned to the investigation unit; Providence fire department arson investigators, provided that the
investigator receiving the permit is a graduate of a police-training academy; correctional officers,
chief inspector and inspectors within the office of inspections, within the department of corrections;
members of the city or town police force; capitol police investigators of the department of attorney
general appointed pursuant to § 42-9-8.1; the witness protection coordinator for the witness
protection review board as set forth in chapter 30 of title 12 and subject to the minimum
qualifications of § 42-9-8.1; automobile theft investigators of the Rhode Island state police pursuant
to § 31-50-1; railroad police while traveling to and from official assignments or while on
assignments; conservation officers; or other duly appointed law enforcement officers; nor to
members of the Army, Navy, Air Force, and Marine Corps of the United States, the National Guard,
or organized reserves, when on duty; nor to members of organizations by law authorized to
purchase or receive firearms from the United States or this state, provided these members are at, or

going to or from, their places of assembly or target practice; nor to officers or employees of the
United States authorized by law to carry a concealed firearm; nor to any civilian guard or criminal
investigator carrying sidearms or a concealed firearm in the performance of his or her official duties
under the authority of the commanding officer of the military establishment in the state of Rhode
Island where he or she is employed by the United States; nor to any civilian guard carrying sidearms
or a concealed firearm in the performance of his or her official duties under the authority of the
adjutant general where he or she is employed guarding a national guard facility, provided, that the
commanding officer of the military establishment shall have on file with the attorney general of
this state a list of the names and addresses of all civilian guards and criminal investigators so
authorized; nor to duly authorized military organizations when on duty; nor to members when at,
or going to or from, their customary places of assembly; nor to any individual employed in the
capacity of warden, associate warden, major, captain, lieutenant, sergeant, correctional officer or
investigator at any project owned or operated by a municipal detention facility corporation,
including the Donald W. Wyatt Detention Facility; nor to the regular and/or ordinary transportation
of pistols or revolvers as merchandise; nor to any person while transporting a pistol, or revolvers,
unloaded from the place of purchase to their residence, or place of business, from their residence
to their place of business or from their place of business to their residence, or to a federal firearms
licensee for the purpose of sale, to or from a bona fide gunsmith, or firearms repair facility, to any
police station or other location designated as a site of a bona fide “gun buy-back” program, but
only if said pistol or revolver is unloaded and any ammunition for said pistol or revolver is not
readily or directly accessible from the passenger compartment of such vehicle while transporting
same and further provided, that in the case of a vehicle without a compartment separate from the
passenger compartment, the firearm or the ammunition shall be stored in a locked container.
(b) Persons exempted by the provisions of this section from the provisions of § 11-47-8
shall have the right to carry concealed firearms everywhere within this state; provided, that this
shall not be construed as giving the right to carry concealed firearms to a person transporting
firearms as merchandise or as household or business goods.
(c) The attorney general shall have the authority to enter into agreements or otherwise
formally approve reciprocal recognition with other states that require an agreement to be in place
before that state will recognize a Rhode Island attorney general and a city or town police department
concealed handgun permit as valid.
(d) The State of Rhode Island shall recognize and honor a concealed handgun or concealed
weapon permit or license issued by any other state or county, provided:
(1) The permit or license holder is a non-resident who is twenty-one (21) years of age or
LC000391 - Page 2 of 4

older;
(2) The reciprocal state or county provides the means for instantaneous verification of the
validity of all such permits or licenses issued within that state or county, accessible twenty-four
(24) hours a day;
(3) The permit or license holder has in their possession the concealed handgun or concealed
weapon permit or license along with a photo identification issued by a state or government agency
and presents for verification the permit or license and identification upon demand by a law
enforcement officer; and
(4) The permit or license holder is subject to the same laws and restrictions with respect to
carrying a concealed weapon or concealed firearm as a resident of Rhode Island, who is so licensed.
(e) The State of Rhode Island shall recognize an official government issued law
enforcement identification card issued to an active-duty law enforcement officer from any other
state or county. These individuals shall be exempted from the provisions of § 11-47-8 and shall
have the right to carry a concealed firearm everywhere within the state.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000391
========
LC000391 - Page 3 of 4